Rhode Island, session 2025, SB410.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21.2-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21.2 entitled "Optional
Retirement for Members of Police Force and Firefighters" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21.2-6. Service retirement allowance.
(a)(1) Upon retirement from service pursuant to § 45-21.2-5, a member receives a
retirement allowance which is a life annuity terminable at the death of the annuitant and shall be an
amount equal to two percent (2%) of final compensation multiplied by the years of total service,
provided that a member who retires upon the attainment of age of fifty-seven (57) years and has
completed at least thirty (30) years of total service shall receive a retirement allowance which is a
life annuity terminable at the death of the annuitant and shall be an amount equal to the greater of:
(i) Two and one quarter percent (2.25%) of final compensation multiplied by total years of service;
or (ii) The member’s accrued benefit determined as of June 30, 2012, plus two and one quarter
percent (2.25%) of final compensation multiplied by member’s years of service after June 30, 2012;
provided further that the life annuity under this subsection (a) shall not exceed seventy-five percent
(75%) of final compensation.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section, commencing on
July 1, 2025, all members, regardless of age or years of service, shall receive a retirement allowance
which is a life annuity terminable at the death of the annuitant and shall be equal to the member's
accrued benefit determined pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section as of June

30, 2025, plus two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the final compensation multiplied by the years
of service after June 30, 2025. Provided, however, a member who retires upon attaining the age of
fifty-seven (57) years and has completed at least thirty (30) years of total service, shall retain the
same retirement allowance as calculated pursuant to provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section
for the period of July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2025 and then be credited for two and one-half
percent (2.5%) per year for services rendered after June 30, 2025.
(b) Upon retirement, the member may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her
retirement allowance in a lesser retirement allowance as determined by actuarial calculation, which
is payable throughout life with the provision that:
(1) Option 1. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life with the
provisions that after his or her death it shall continue during the life of and be paid to the person
that he or she nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement
board at the time of retirement; or
(2) Option 2. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life with the
provision that after his or her death an allowance equal to one-half (½) of his or her reduced
allowance shall continue during the life of and be paid to the person that he or she nominated by
written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board at the time of retirement.
(c) If prior to July 1, 2012, a member elected an optional form of benefit other than a life
annuity in accordance with paragraph (b)(1) or (2) above, the member may elect to change his or
her form of benefit to a life annuity by filing an election with the retirement board on or before
June 30, 2013, provided that the member’s beneficiary is still alive at the time the election is filed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001728
========
LC001728 - Page 2 of 3